Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 51.
VOTER REGISTRATION.

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by initiative petition and approved at the general election on Nov. 3, 1964, by a vote of 277,087 for and 218,681 against.

Effective Dates.

Const. Amend. 51, § 21: Jan. 1, 1965.

Acts 1987, No. 800, § 3: Apr. 8, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Section 11 of Amendment 51 to the Arkansas Constitution requires the Permanent Registrar to cancel without prior notice, the voter registration of persons who have failed to vote within four (4) consecutive years; that it is preferable that voters be notified prior to cancellation so that they may avoid the cancellation of their voter registration; that this Act amends Amendment 51 to provide such prior notice and that unless it is given immediate effect, some voter registration affidavits may be cancelled without prior notice. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Identical Acts 1995, Nos. 947 and 964, § 13: Jan. 1, 1996.

Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 4: Dec. 22, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the federal Help America Vote Act establishes deadlines for the state's compliance with the act's voter registration requirements; and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to ensure the state meets its deadlines. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

§ 1. Statement of policy.

The purpose of this amendment is to establish a system of permanent personal registration as a means of determining that all who cast ballots in general, special and primary elections in this State are legally qualified to vote in such elections, in accordance with the Constitution of Arkansas and the Constitution of the United States.

§ 2. Definitions.

As used in this amendment, the terms:

“County Board of Registration” means the County Board of Election Commissioners in each of the several counties of this State.

“Permanent Registrar” means the County Clerk in each of the several counties of this State.

“Deputy Registrar” means the Deputy County Clerk or clerical assistants appointed by the County Clerk.

“Election” means any general, special or primary election held pursuant to any provisions of the Constitution or statutes of the State of Arkansas; provided, that this amendment shall not apply to selection of delegates to party conventions by party committees or to selection of party committeemen by party conventions.

§ 3. Application.

No person shall vote or be permitted to vote in any election unless registered in a manner provided for by this amendment.

§ 4. Permanent registration.

When a voter is once registered under the provisions of this amendment, it is unnecessary for such voter again to register unless such registration is cancelled or subject to cancellation in a manner provided for by this amendment.

§ 5. Duties of registration officials.

Voter registration agencies shall distribute mail voter registration applications, provide assistance to applicants in completing voter registration application forms, unless the applicant refuses assistance, and accept completed voter registration application forms for transmittal to the appropriate permanent registrar via the Secretary of State. Voter registration agencies include the following:

The Office of Driver Services of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration and all State Revenue Offices;

Public assistance agencies, which shall mean those agencies that provide services under the Food Stamps, Medicaid, Aid to Families with Dependent Children (AFDC), and the Special Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants and Children (WIC) programs;

Disabilities agencies, which shall mean agencies that offer state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities;

Public libraries; and

The Arkansas National Guard.

The Secretary of State is designated as the chief election official. The Secretary shall prepare and distribute the pre-addressed postcard mail voter registration application forms described in 51-6 [section 6] of this amendment. Mail registration application forms shall serve for purposes of initial applications to register and shall also serve for changes of name, address, or party affiliation. Bilingual (Spanish/English) forms, braille forms, and large print forms shall be available upon request. The Secretary of State shall make the state mail voter registration application form available for distribution through governmental and private entities with particular emphasis on making them available for organized voter registration programs. Any person may distribute state registration cards. All registration cards shall be distributed to the public without charge.

The Office of Driver Services and State Revenue Offices shall provide voter registration opportunities to those obtaining or renewing drivers licenses, personal identification cards, duplicate or corrected licenses or cards, or changing address or name whether in person or by mail. The Office of Driver Services and State Revenue Offices shall use a computer process, which combines the drivers license and voter registration applications, minimizing duplicative information, and shall have available the federal or state mail voter registration application form, which may be used upon request or when the computer process is not available. If a person declines to apply to register to vote, the Office of Driver Services or State Revenue Office shall retain the record of declination for two (2) years.

All public assistance agencies shall provide a federal or state mail voter registration application form with each application for assistance, and with each recertification, renewal or change of address or name relating to such assistance. Public assistance agencies shall provide voter registration application forms as part of the intake process, or as a combined computer process when a computer process is available. Public assistance agencies shall use a process or form that combines the application for assistance with the voter registration application when available. Public assistance agencies shall also provide declination forms as described in 51-6 [section 6] of this amendment, which shall be retained for two (2) years if an applicant declines to apply to register to vote.

All disabilities agencies shall provide a federal or state mail voter registration application form with each application for services and with each recertification, renewal or change of address or name relating to such services. Disabilities agencies shall provide voter registration application forms as part of the intake process, or as a combined computer process when a computer process is available. Disabilities agencies may use a form that combines the application for services or assistance with the voter registration application when available. If the disabilities agency provides services in a person's home, then the agency shall also provide voter registration services at the person's home. Disabilities agencies shall also provide declination forms as described in 51-6 [section 6] of this amendment, which shall be retained for two (2) years if an applicant declines to apply to register to vote.

Employees of the Office of Driver Services and State Revenue Offices shall provide appropriate nonpartisan voter registration assistance and provide all applicants with a receipt containing the applicant's name and the date of the submission.

Public assistance agencies and disabilities agencies shall train agency employees to provide the same degree of assistance in completing voter registration forms as is provided with regard to the completion of agency forms, unless the applicant refuses such assistance.

Each revenue office, public assistance agency and disabilities agency shall provide ongoing training for employees who will be assisting persons with voter registration applications and shall include information regarding training procedures in the report filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to § 51-8(d) [section 8(d)] of this amendment.

A person who provides voter registration assistance through any voter registration agency shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant's political preference or party registration;

Display any such political preference or party allegiance;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action to the purpose or effect of discouraging the applicant from registering to vote;

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action to the purpose or effect of leading the applicant to believe that a decision to register or not to register has any bearing on the availability of services or benefits; or

Disclose any applicant's voter registration information, except as necessary for the administration of voter registration.

The Permanent Registrar shall provide office and clerical facilities and may employ such clerical assistants which he may deem necessary to fulfill the duties imposed by this amendment; provided, that all clerical assistants so employed shall have the qualifications required by law of eligible voters and shall be selected on the basis of competence and without reference to political affiliation.

The State Board of Election Commissioners is authorized and, as soon as is possible after the effective date of this amendment, directed to prescribe, adopt, publish and distribute:

such Rules and Regulations supplementary to this amendment and consistent with this amendment and other laws of Arkansas as are necessary to secure uniform and efficient procedures in the administration of this amendment throughout the State;

a Manual of instruction for the information, guidance and direction of election officials within the state; and

detailed specifications of the registration record files, the voter registration application forms and other registration forms, including voter registration list maintenance forms, all of which shall be consistent with this amendment and uniform throughout the State. [As amended by Acts 1995, No. 599, § 1; 1995, No. 947, § 1; 1995, No. 964, § 1.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 1995 amendment by No. 599 rewrote (c)(2); and made minor capitalization changes.The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

§ 6. Voter registration application forms.

The mail voter registration application form may only require identifying information, including signature or mark, and other information, including data relating to previous registration by the applicant, as is necessary to assess the applicant's eligibility and to administer voter registration and other parts of the election process.

Such forms shall include, in identical print, statements that:

Specify voter eligibility requirements;

Contain an attestation that the applicant meets all voter eligibility requirements and that the applicant does not claim the right to vote in another county or state;

Specify the penalties provided by law for submission of a false voter registration application;

Inform applicants that where they register to vote will be kept confidential;

Inform applicants that declining to register will also be kept confidential; and

Inform applicants that they will be required to verify their registration when voting in person or by absentee ballot by providing a required document or identification card as provided in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13.

The following information will be required of the applicant:

Full name;

Mailing address;

Residence address and any other information necessary to identify the residence of the applicant;

If previously registered, the name then supplied by the applicant, and the previous address, county, and state;

Date of birth;

A signature or mark made under penalty of perjury that the applicant meets each requirement for voter registration;

If the applicant is unable to sign his or her name, the name, address, and telephone number of the person providing assistance;

If the applicant has a current and valid driver's license, the applicant's driver's license number;

If the applicant does not have a current and valid driver's license, the last four (4) digits of the applicant's social security number; and

If the applicant does not have a current and valid driver's license number or social security number, the Secretary of State will assign the applicant a number which will serve to identify the applicant for voter registration purposes, and this number shall be placed on the application.

The following information may be requested on the registration card, but it shall not be required:

Telephone number where the applicant may be contacted; and

Political party with which the applicant wishes to be affiliated, if any.

The mail voter registration application shall not include any requirement for notarization or other formal authentication.

The mail voter registration application form shall include the following questions along with boxes for the applicant to check “yes” or “no” in response:

“Are you a citizen of the United States of America and an Arkansas resident?”;

“Will you be eighteen (18) years of age on or before election day?”;

“Are you presently adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction?”; and

“Have you ever been convicted of a felony without your sentence having been discharged or pardoned?”.

The mail voter registration application form shall include the following statements immediately following the questions asked in subdivision (a)(6) of this section:

“If you checked ‘No’ in response to either questions A or B, do not complete this form.”;

“If you checked ‘Yes’ in response to either questions C or D, do not complete this form.”; and

The mail-in voter registration application form shall include the following statement:

If an applicant for voter registration fails to provide any of the information required by this section, the permanent registrar shall notify the applicant of the failure and provide the applicant with an opportunity to complete the form in a timely manner to allow for its completion before the next election for federal office.

The mail voter registration application shall be pre-addressed to the Secretary of State.

The voter registration application portion of the process used by the Office of Driver Services and state revenue offices shall include:

The question: “If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today?”;

A statement that if an applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes;

A statement that if an applicant does register to vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes;

Voter registration eligibility requirements;

Penalties provided by law for providing false information;

An attestation that the applicant meets each eligibility requirement and that the applicant does not claim the right to vote in another county or state; and

A space for the applicant's signature or mark.

The voter registration application portion shall require the signature of the applicant under penalty of perjury, but shall not require notarization or other formal authentication.

Public assistance agencies and disabilities agencies shall provide, in addition to the federal or state mail voter registration application form, a declination form, to be approved by the State Board of Election Commissioners, which includes the following question and statements:

The question in prominent type, “IF YOU ARE NOT REGISTERED TO VOTE WHERE YOU LIVE NOW, WOULD YOU LIKE TO APPLY TO REGISTER TO VOTE HERE TODAY? YES NO ”;

The statement in close proximity to the question above and in equally prominent type, “IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX, YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.”;

The statement, “APPLYING TO REGISTER OR DECLINING TO REGISTER TO VOTE WILL NOT AFFECT THE AMOUNT OF ASSISTANCE THAT YOU WILL BE PROVIDED BY THIS AGENCY.”;

The statement, “IF YOU WOULD LIKE HELP IN FILLING OUT THE VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION FORM, WE WILL HELP YOU. THE DECISION WHETHER TO SEEK OR ACCEPT HELP IS YOURS. YOU MAY FILL OUT THE APPLICATION FORM IN PRIVATE.”;

The statement, “IF YOU BELIEVE THAT SOMEONE HAS INTERFERED WITH YOUR RIGHT TO REGISTER OR TO DECLINE TO REGISTER TO VOTE, YOUR RIGHT TO PRIVACY IN DECIDING WHETHER TO REGISTER OR IN APPLYING TO REGISTER TO VOTE, OR YOUR RIGHT TO CHOOSE YOUR OWN POLITICAL PARTY OR OTHER POLITICAL PREFERENCE, YOU MAY FILE A COMPLAINT WITH THE SECRETARY OF STATE AT ” (filled in with the address and telephone number of the Secretary of State's office);

The statement, “IF YOU DECLINE TO REGISTER TO VOTE, THE FACT THAT YOU HAVE DECLINED TO REGISTER WILL REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND WILL BE USED ONLY FOR VOTER REGISTRATION PURPOSES.”; and

The statement, “IF YOU DO REGISTER TO VOTE, THE OFFICE AT WHICH YOU SUBMIT A VOTER REGISTRATION APPLICATION WILL REMAIN CONFIDENTIAL AND WILL BE USED ONLY FOR VOTER REGISTRATION PURPOSES.”.

“If your voter registration application form is submitted by mail and you are registering for the first time, and you do not have a valid driver's license number or Social Security number, in order to avoid the additional identification requirements upon voting for the first time you must submit with the mailed registration form: (a) a current and valid photo identification; or (b) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck, or other government document that shows your name and address.”

[As amended by Acts 1971, No. 828, § 1; 1995, No. 947, § 2; 1995, No. 964, § 2; 2003, No. 995, § 1; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 1; 2009, No. 659, §
1; 2017, No. 633, § 1.]

Publisher's Notes.

Before amendment by Acts 1971, No. 828, subdivision (8) read: “number or name of the voter's school district and number or name of the voter's precinct.”

The proviso to subdivision (a)(8)(b) read exactly as it appeared in the 1971 amendment prior to further amendment in 1995.

Acts 1971, No. 828, § 2 read: “The amendment of Subsection (8) of Section 6 of Amendment 51 of the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, as provided in Section 1 hereof, is hereby made in conformance with the provisions of Section 19 of said Amendment 51 to the Constitution of the State of Arkansas, it being the determination of the General Assembly that said Amendment is germane to Amendment 51 and is consistent with its policy and purposes.”

Legislative Amendments.

The 1971 amendment added (a)(8)(b).

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

The 2003 amendment added (a)(3)(H) through (a)(3)(J); deleted former (a)(4)(B) and redesignated former (a)(4)(C) as present (a)(4)(B); in (a)(6), substituted “form shall include the following questions along with boxes for the applicant to check ‘yes’ or ‘no’ in response” for “shall be pre-addressed to the Secretary of State”; added (a)(6)(A) through (a)(9); and made related and gender-neutral changes.

The 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment added (a)(7)(C)(ii); and substituted “provide any of the information required by” for “answer the questions included in subdivision (a)(6) of” in (a)(8).

The 2009 amendment inserted “and that the applicant does not claim the right to vote in another county or state” in (a)(2)(B) and (b)(1)(F); substituted “been convicted” for “pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, or found guilty” in (a)(6)(D); deleted (a)(6)(E), which read: “‘Do you claim the right to vote in another county or state?’”; substituted “either questions C or D” for “one or more of questions C, D, or E” in (a)(7)(B); rewrote (a)(7)(C); and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment added (a)(2)(F).

§ 7. Registration record files.

By the deadline to establish a computerized statewide voter registration database under the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002, including any waivers or extensions of that deadline, the Secretary of State shall define, maintain, and administer the official, centralized, and interactive computerized voter registration list for all voters legally residing within the State. The list shall include:

The name, address, county, precinct, assigned unique identifier and registration information of every legally registered voter in the state;

The inactive registration records of persons who have failed to respond to address confirmation mailings described in § 10 of this amendment;

List maintenance information for each person receiving address confirmation notices or final address confirmation notices, or both, and the person's response; and

Cancelled voter registration records and documentation noting the reason for cancellation.

The computerized list shall serve as the single system for storing and managing the official list of registered voters throughout the state.

The computerized list shall serve as the official voter registration list for the conduct of all elections for federal, state, county, municipal, school, or other office in the state.

The permanent registrar of each county shall maintain copies of that county's precinct voter registration list from the statewide computerized list as necessary for holding elections.

The computerized list shall be coordinated with other state agency records on felony status as maintained by the Arkansas Crime Information Center, records on death as maintained by the State Department of Health, and driver's license records maintained by the Office of Driver Services, according to § 9 of Amendment 51 to the Arkansas Constitution.

A person with an inactive voter registration status may activate his or her voting status by appearing to vote at the precinct in which he or she currently resides or by updating his or her voter registration records with the permanent registrar of the county in which he or she resides.

The county board of election commissioners or other lawfully designated election officials shall cause the appropriate precinct voter registration lists to be at the polling places on the date of elections, and shall return them at the close of the election to the office of the permanent registrar with the ballot boxes.

If the legal residence of a voter is renamed, renumbered, or annexed, the permanent registrar or any local election official may change the name or number of the legal residence on the voter's registration record and any other voting records. Within fifteen (15) days after the records are changed to reflect the new name or number of the residence, the permanent registrar shall notify the voter by mail that the change has been made.

The Secretary of State and any permanent registrar in the state, may obtain immediate electronic access to the information contained in the computerized list.

All voter registration information obtained by any local election official in the state shall be electronically entered into the computerized list on an expedited basis at the time the information is provided to the local official.

The Secretary of State shall provide the support as may be required so that local election officials are able to enter the information. [As amended by Acts 1971, No. 299, § 1; 1973, No. 149, §§ 1-4; 1977, No. 563, § 1; 1991, No. 410, § 1; 1995, No. 947, § 3; 1995, No. 964, § 3; 2003, No. 995, § 2; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 8, §§ 2, 3.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 1971 amendment substituted the word “Affidavit” for “Affidavits” preceding the words “of Registration” in subdivision (a)(3) and added the fifth paragraph. The 1973 amendment inserted the words “or Supplement Record of Voting Form” in subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) and subsection (b) and (d).

The 1977 amendment, in the first sentence of subsection (c), substituted “permanent registrars” for “the Permanent Registrar” preceding “shall provide,” and deleted the words “securely fastened” following “shall contain”; and added the second and third sentences.

The 1991 amendment added (f).

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

The 2003 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.) amendment added “By the deadline … extensions of that deadline” in (a); and, in (i)(1), substituted “The Secretary of State and any permanent registrar” for “Any elected official” and deleted “including any local election official” following “in the state”.

Preambles.

Acts 1973, No. 149, contained a preamble which read: “Whereas, Section 19 of Amendment 51 of the Constitution of Arkansas specifically provides for the amendment of Sections 5 through 15 of said amendment by the General Assembly in the same manner as is required for amendment of laws initiated by the people … .”

§ 8. Voter registration application records and reports.

The Office of Driver Services, State Revenue Offices, public assistance agencies, disabilities agencies, and other voter registration agencies shall transmit all completed voter registration applications to the Secretary of State in sufficient time to allow the Secretary of State to transmit the applications to the appropriate permanent registrar no later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance by the assisting agency. When applications are accepted within five (5) days before the last day of registration for an election, they must be transmitted no later than five (5) days after the date of acceptance at the assisting agency.

The Secretary of State shall transmit all mail voter registration applications to the appropriate permanent registrar no later than ten (10) days after the date of receipt. When applications are received within five (5) days before the last day of registration for an election, they must be transmitted no later than five (5) days after date of receipt. If forms are received by the wrong election office, they shall be forwarded to the appropriate permanent registrar not later than the fifth day after receipt.

The Office of Driver Services, State Revenue Offices, public assistance agencies, disabilities and other voter registration agencies shall collect data on the number of voter registration applications completed or declined at each agency, and any additional statistical evidence that the Secretary of State or the State Board of Election Commissioners deems necessary for program evaluation and shall retain such voter registration data for a period of two (2) years.

The Secretary of State shall collect, maintain, and publish monthly statistical data reflecting the number of new voter registration applications, changes of address, name, and party affiliation, and declinations received by mail and in:

state revenue offices;

public assistance agencies;

disabilities agencies;

recruitment offices of the Armed Forces of the United States;

public libraries; and

offices of the Arkansas National Guard.

Every six (6) months the Secretary of State shall compile a statewide report available to the public reflecting the statistical data collected pursuant to subsection (a). This report shall be submitted to the Federal Election Commission for the national report pursuant to section (9)(a)(3) of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. The state report shall also include:

numbers of and descriptions of the agencies, and the method of integrating voter registration in the agencies;

an assessment of the impact of the National Voter Registration Act of 1993 on the administration of elections;

recommendations for improvements in procedures, forms, and other matters affected by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993.

Every six (6) months the state-level administration of each voter registration agency shall issue a report to the Legislative Council and the Secretary of State containing the statistical and other information collected in each agency office, and recommendations for improvements in procedures, forms, and other matters, including training.

Information relating to the place where a person registered to vote, submitted a voter registration application, or updated voter registration records, and information relating to declination forms is confidential and exempt from the Freedom of Information Act, § 25-19-101, et seq. [As amended by Acts 1989, No. 540, § 1; 1995, No. 947, § 4; 1995, No. 964, § 4.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 1989 amendment added (b).

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

U.S. Code.

The National Voter Registration Act of 1993, referred to in this section, is codified as 52 U.S.C. § 20501 et seq.

§ 9. Application to register.

All persons may register who:

Have not been convicted of a felony unless the person's sentence has been discharged or the person has been pardoned;

Have not been adjudged mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction; and

Meet one (1) of the following requirements:

Are qualified electors who have not previously registered;

Will become qualified electors during the thirty-day period immediately prior to the next election scheduled within the county; or

Are otherwise qualified electors but whose registration has been cancelled in a manner provided for by this amendment.

Registration shall be in progress at all times except during the thirty-day period immediately prior to any election scheduled within the county, during which period registration of voters shall cease for that election, but registration during such period shall be effective for subsequent elections.

The permanent registrar shall register qualified applicants when a legible and complete voter registration application is received and acknowledged by the permanent registrar.

Any person who assists applicants with a voter registration application as part of a voter registration drive or who, in furtherance of a voter registration drive, gathers or possesses completed applications for submission to the permanent registrar or Secretary of State shall deliver all applications in his or her possession to the permanent registrar or Secretary of State within twenty-one (21) days of the date on the voter registration application and, in any event, no later than the deadline for voter registration for the next election.

The permanent registrar shall register qualified applicants who apply to register to vote by mail using the state or federal mail voter registration application form if:

A legible and complete voter registration application form is postmarked not later than thirty (30) days before the date of the election, or, if the form is received by mail without a postmark, not later than twenty-five (25) days before the date of an election; and

The applicant provides a current valid driver's license number or the last four (4) digits of the applicant's social security number; or

If an applicant for voter registration does not have a valid driver's license or a social security number, the Secretary of State shall assign the applicant a number that will serve as a unique identifier of the applicant for voter registration purposes.

The permanent registrar shall notify applicants whether their applications are accepted or rejected or are incomplete. If information required by the permanent registrar is missing from the voter registration application, the permanent registrar shall contact the applicant to obtain the missing information.

The Secretary of State and the Director of the Office of Driver Services shall enter into an agreement to match information in the database of the statewide voter registration system with information in the database of the Office of Driver Services to the extent required to enable each official to verify the accuracy of the information provided on applications for voter registration. The Director of the Office of Driver Services shall enter into an agreement with the Commissioner of Social Security to verify driver's license information according to § 303 of the Federal Help America Vote Act of 2002.

Registration records shall be entered promptly in the computerized statewide registration record files. If the applicant lacks one (1) or more of the qualifications required by law of voters in this state, the permanent registrar shall not register the applicant, but shall document the reason for denying the applicant's registration and promptly file or enter the application and the documented reason for denying registration in the statewide registration record files.

If the permanent registrar has any reason to doubt the qualifications of an applicant for registration, he or she shall submit such application to the county board of election commissioners, and such board shall make a determination with respect to such qualifications and shall instruct the permanent registrar regarding the same.

If any person eligible to register as a voter is unable to register in person at the permanent registrar's office by reason of sickness or physical disability, the permanent registrar shall register the applicant at his or her place of abode within such county, if practicable, in the same manner as if he or she had appeared at the permanent registrar's office.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this amendment, every person in any of the following categories who is absent from the place of his or her voting residence may vote without prior registration by absentee ballot by submission of a federal postal card application as provided for in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act in any primary, special, school, or general election held in his or her election precinct if he or she is otherwise eligible to vote in that election:

Members of the uniformed services of the United States while in active duty or service, and their spouses and dependents who, by reason of the active duty or service of the member, are absent from the place of residence where the spouse or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote;

Members of the Merchant Marine while in active duty or service, and their spouses and dependents who, by reason of the active duty or service of the member, are absent from the place of residence where the spouse or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote; and

Citizens of the United States residing or temporarily outside the territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia.

The Secretary of State shall be responsible for providing to all absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters who wish to register to vote or vote in any jurisdiction in the state, information regarding voter registration procedures and absentee ballot procedures.

No later than ninety (90) days after the date of each regularly scheduled general election for federal office, the Secretary of State shall submit a report, based on information submitted to him or her by the permanent registrars of each county, to the Election Assistance Commission on the combined number of absentee ballots transmitted to absent uniformed services voters and overseas voters for the election and the combined number of the ballots which were returned by the voters and cast in the election.

The Secretary of State shall make the report available to the general public.

Any person whose registration status or voting eligibility is affected adversely by an administrative determination under this amendment may appeal such adverse determination within five (5) days of receipt of notice thereof to the county board of election commissioners. The county board of election commissioners shall act on such appeal and render its decision within ten (10) days of its receipt. Within thirty (30) days after receipt of such decision, any aggrieved party may appeal further to the circuit court of the county.

If an election law deadline occurs on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the deadline shall be the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. [As amended by Acts 1971, No. 184, § 1; 1993, No. 561, § 1; 1995, No. 947, § 5; 1995, No. 964, § 5; 1999, No. 654, § 1; 2003, No. 995, § 3; 2005, No. 1952, § 1; 2009, No. 659, § 2.]

Publisher's Notes.

The Election Assistance Commission, referred to in subdivision (j)(2), is a federal commission.

Before the 1971 amendment, subsection (f) read: “Notwithstanding other provisions of this amendment, all members of the armed forces of the United States and their spouses when residing with or accompanying them, who are otherwise eligible, may vote without registration by absentee ballot in accordance with the laws of this State”.

Section 9 of Amendment 51 to the Arkansas Constitution was amended by the General Assembly pursuant to the authority granted in Section 19 of that Amendment.

Legislative Amendments.

The 1993 amendment added (h).

The 1995 amendment by identical acts Nos. 947 and 964 rewrote this section.

The 1999 amendment added (j).

The 2003 amendment added the (c)(2)(A) subdivision designation and added (c)(2)(B); added present (e); redesignated former (e) through (h) as present (f) through (i); added present (j); redesignated former (i) and (j) as present (k) and (l); in present (f), deleted “filed or” preceding “entered”, inserted “computerized statewide” preceding “registration record files”, and “statewide” following “registration in the”; substituted “election commissioners” for “registration” in present (g) and (k); and made gender-neutral and stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment added present (c)(2) and redesignated former (c)(2) as present (c)(3).

The 2009 amendment inserted (a)(1)-(3); inserted “Meet one (1) of the following requirements” in the introductory language of (a)(3); inserted “otherwise” in (a)(3)(C); in the introductory language of (i), inserted “prior”, “by submission of a federal postal card application as provided for in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act”, and “school”; inserted “who, by reason of the active duty or service of the member, are absent from the place of residence where the spouse or dependent is otherwise qualified to vote” in (i)(1) and (i)(2); deleted “and their spouses and dependents when residing with or accompanying them” following “Columbia” in (i)(3); and made related and stylistic changes.

U.S. Code.

The federal Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in (e), is Pub. L. No. 107-252. Section 303 of that act is compiled as 52 U.S.C. § 21083.

The Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, referred to in (i), is codified generally as 52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.

Cross References.

Language identical to subsection (j) [now (l)], as amended by Acts 1999, No. 654, § 1, appears at § 7-1-108, as enacted by Acts 1999, No. 653.